Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-943
Subjects' rights during proceedings against them.

In addition to the rights granted subjects by any other provisions of the Nebraska Mental Health Commitment Act, such subjects shall be entitled to the rights provided in sections 71-943 to 71-960 during proceedings concerning the subjects under the act.

Laws 1976, LB 806, § 57;

Laws 2000, LB 884, § 10;

R.S.Supp.,2002, § 83-1047;

Laws 2004, LB 1083, § 63.